Utah statutes.
63M-1-1801.   Purpose.

(1)  The Legislature finds that:

(a)  the state's natural beauty, scenic wonders, and diverse topography provide a variety of magnificent settings from which the motion picture industry can choose to film part or all of major or independent motion pictures, made-for-television movies, and television series;

(b)  the state has an abundance of resources, including a skilled and able workforce, the required infrastructure, and a friendly and hospitable populace that have been instrumental in the filming of hundreds of successful motion pictures and several television series; and

(c)  further development of the motion picture industry in Utah is a state public purpose that will significantly impact growth in the state's economy and contribute to the fiscal well being of the state and its people.

(2)  The purpose of this part is to:

(a)  encourage the use of Utah as a site for the production of motion pictures, television series, and made-for-television movies;

(b)  provide financial incentives to the film industry so that Utah might compete successfully with other states and countries for filming locations; and

(c)  help develop a strong motion picture industry presence in the state that will contribute substantially to improving the state's economy.



Amended by Chapter 135, 2009 General Session

